src/indecl-lexc.txt
LEXICON Root
    Conj ;
    Prep ;
    Sub ;

! TODO: que, ve are clitics. Probably need to be special-cased, somehow.
LEXICON Conj
an:an+Conj # ;
atque:atque+Conj # ;
aut:aut+Conj # ;
et:et+Conj # ;
neu:neu+Conj # ;
que:que+Conj # ;
sed:sed+Conj # ;
simul:simul+Conj # ;
sive:sive+Conj # ;
ve:ve+Conj # ;
vel:vel+Conj # ;

LEXICON Prep
ab:ab+Prep # ;
absque:absque+Prep # ;
ad:ad+Prep # ;
adversus:adversus+Prep # ;
ante:ante+Prep # ;
apud:apud+Prep # ;
cata:cata+Prep # ;
circa:circa+Prep # ;
circum:circum+Prep # ;
cis:cis+Prep # ;
citra:citra+Prep # ;
contra:contra+Prep # ;
coram:coram+Prep # ;
cum:cum+Prep # ;
de:de+Prep # ;
erga:erga+Prep # ;
ex:ex+Prep # ;
extra:extra+Prep # ;
foras:foras+Prep # ;
in:in+Prep # ;
infra:infra+Prep # ;
inter:inter+Prep # ;
intra:intra+Prep # ;
intro:intro+Prep # ;
iuxta:iuxta+Prep # ;
ob:ob+Prep # ;
obviam:obviam+Prep # ;
palam:palam+Prep # ;
penes:penes+Prep # ;
per:per+Prep # ;
post:post+Prep # ;
prae:prae+Prep # ;
praeter:praeter+Prep # ;
pro:pro+Prep # ;
prope:prope+Prep # ;
propter:propter+Prep # ;
retro:retro+Prep # ;
secundum:secundum+Prep # ;
secus:secus+Prep # ;
sine:sine+Prep # ;
sub:sub+Prep # ;
subter:subter+Prep # ;
subtus:subtus+Prep # ;
super:super+Prep # ;
supra:supra+Prep # ;
trans:trans+Prep # ;
ultra:ultra+Prep # ;

LEXICON Sub
an:an+Sub # ;
antequam:antequam+Sub # ;
atque:atque+Sub # ;
cum:cum+Sub # ;
cumque:cumque+Sub # ;
donec:donec+Sub # ;
dum:dum+Sub # ;
dummodo:dummodo+Sub # ;
etsi:etsi+Sub # ;
ex:ex+Sub # ;
licet:licet+Sub # ;
mox:mox+Sub # ;
ne:ne+Sub # ;
nequando:nequando+Sub # ;
nisi:nisi+Sub # ;
post:post+Sub # ;
posteaquam:posteaquam+Sub # ;
! XXX: Multiword unit!
!postmodum quam
postquam:postquam+Sub # ;
priusquam:priusquam+Sub # ;
quam:quam+Sub # ;
quamlibet:quamlibet+Sub # ;
quamquam:quamquam+Sub # ;
quamvis:quamvis+Sub # ;
quasi:quasi+Sub # ;
quia:quia+Sub # ;
quin:quin+Sub # ;
quo:quo+Sub # ;
quoadusque:quoadusque+Sub # ;
quod:quod+Sub # ;
quominus:quominus+Sub # ;
quoniam:quoniam+Sub # ;
quousque:quousque+Sub # ;
si:si+Sub # ;
simul:simul+Sub # ;
sin:sin+Sub # ;
siquidem:siquidem+Sub # ;
tametsi:tametsi+Sub # ;
ut:ut+Sub # ;
